test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-myadoTS_gt-norm.yaml
# NB! Following stem-final modifications take place in AccPl stem: ва -> би, ка -> ци, га -> зи
# #+Use/SpellNoSugg
  Noun - мяˮ: # Noun 'myaq /(fin) kota' - full paradigm /MDTN-koodi t+o/
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom: мяˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc: мядмʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen: мядʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat: мятʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc: [мякана, мякна]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl: мякад
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros: мяˮамна
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom: мякʼ
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc: мякʼ
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen: мякʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom: мядˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc: мядо
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen: мядоˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat: мякˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc: [мякаˮна, мякˮна]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl: мякат
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros: мядоˮмана
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [мяˮам, мяˮми]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [мяˮам, мяˮми]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [мяˮан, мяˮни]
#     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: мяˮми # +Use/SpellNoSugg
#     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: мяˮми # +Use/SpellNoSugg
#     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: мяˮни # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [мякан, мякани, мякни]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [мяканан, мякнан, мяканани, мякнани]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [мякадан, мякдан, мякадани, мякдани]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [мяˮамнан, мяˮамнани]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [мякаюн, мякюн, мякаюни, мякюни]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [мякаюн, мякюн, мякаюни, мякюни]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [мякаюн, мякюн, мякаюни, мякюни]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [мядон, мядони]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [мядон, мядони]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [мядоˮн, мядоˮни]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [мякаˮн, мякаˮни, мякˮни]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [мякаˮнан, мякˮнан, мякаˮнани, мякˮнани]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [мякатан, мяктан, мякатани, мяктани]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [мядоˮманан, мядоˮманани]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: мяˮал
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: мят
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: мят
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: мяканд
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [мякананд, мякнанд]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: [мякаданд, мякданд]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: мяˮамнанд
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [мякаюд, мякюд]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: [мякаюд, мякюд]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: [мякают, мякют]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: мядод
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: мядод
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: мядот
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: мякат
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [мякаˮнат, мякˮнат]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [мякатат, мяктат]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: мядоˮманат
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: мята
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: мята
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: мята
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: мяканда
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [мякананда, мякнанда]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [мякаданда, мякданда]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: мяˮамнанда
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: [мякаюда, мякюда]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: [мякаюда, мякюда]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: [мякаюта, мякюта]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: мядода
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: мядода
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: мядота
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [мяката, мякта]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [мякаˮната, мякˮната]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [мякатата, мяктата]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: мядоˮманата
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: мяˮмиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: мяˮмиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: мяˮниʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: [мяканиʼ, мякниʼ]
#     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [мякани, мякни] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [мякананиʼ, мякнаниʼ]
#     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [мяканани, мякнани] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [мякаданиʼ, мякданиʼ]
#     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [мякадани, мякдани] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: мяˮамнаниʼ
#     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: мяˮамнани # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [мякаюниʼ, мякюниʼ]
#     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [мякаюни, мякюни] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: [мякаюниʼ, мякюниʼ]
#     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [мякаюни, мякюни] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: [мякаюниʼ, мякюниʼ]
#     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [мякаюни, мякюни] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: мядониʼ
#     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: мядони # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: мядониʼ
#     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: мядони # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: мядоˮниʼ
#     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: мядоˮни # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: [мякаˮниʼ, мякˮниʼ]
#     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [мякаˮни, мякˮни] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [мякаˮнаниʼ, мякˮнаниʼ]
#     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [мякаˮнани, мякˮнани] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [мякатаниʼ, мяктаниʼ]
#     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [мякатани, мяктани] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: мядоˮмананиʼ
#     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: мядоˮманани # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: мяˮлиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: мятиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: мятиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: мякандиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [мяканандиʼ, мякнандиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [мякадандиʼ, мякдандиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: мяˮамнандиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [мякаюдиʼ, мякюдиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: [мякаюдиʼ, мякюдиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: [мякаютиʼ, мякютиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: мядодиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: мядодиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: мядотиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: [мякатиʼ, мяктиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [мякаˮнатиʼ, мякˮнатиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [мякататиʼ, мяктатиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: мядоˮманатиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: мятиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: мятиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: мятиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: мякандиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [мяканандиʼ, мякнандиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [мякадандиʼ, мякдандиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: мяˮамнандиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [мякаюдиʼ, мякюдиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: [мякаюдиʼ, мякюдиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: [мякаютиʼ, мякютиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: мядодиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: мядодиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: мядотиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: [мякатиʼ, мяктиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [мякаˮнатиʼ, мякˮнатиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [мякататиʼ, мяктатиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: мядоˮманатиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: мяˮмаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: мяˮмаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: мяˮнаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: [мяканаˮ, мякнаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [мякананаˮ, мякнанаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [мякаданаˮ, мякданаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: мяˮамнанаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: [мякаюнаˮ, мякюнаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: [мякаюнаˮ, мякюнаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: [мякаюнаˮ, мякюнаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: мядонаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: мядонаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: мядоˮнаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: [мякаˮнаˮ, мякˮнаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [мякаˮнанаˮ, мякˮнанаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [мякатанаˮ, мяктанаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: мядоˮмананаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: мяˮлаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: мятаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: мятаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: мякандаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [мяканандаˮ, мякнандаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [мякадандаˮ, мякдандаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: мяˮамнандаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [мякаюдаˮ, мякюдаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: [мякаюдаˮ, мякюдаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: [мякаютаˮ, мякютаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: мядодаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: мядодаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: мядотаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: [мякатаˮ, мяктаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [мякаˮнатаˮ, мякˮнатаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [мякататаˮ, мяктатаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: мядоˮманатаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: мятоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: мятоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: мятоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: мякандоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [мяканандоʼ, мякнандоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: [мякадандоʼ, мякдандоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: мяˮамнандоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: [мякаюдоʼ, мякюдоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: [мякаюдоʼ, мякюдоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: [мякаютоʼ, мякютоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: мядодоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: мядодоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: мядотоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: [мякатоʼ, мяктоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [мякаˮнатоʼ, мякˮнатоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [мякататоʼ, мяктатоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: мядоˮманатоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Abs: мят
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [мятав, мятув, мятами, мятми]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [мятав, мятув, мятами, мятми]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [мятан, мятани, мятни]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: мятар
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: мятамд
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: мятанд
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [мятада, мятда]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [мятамда, мятмда]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [мятанда, мятнда]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [мятамиʼ, мятмиʼ]
#     мяˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [мятами, мятми] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [мятамиʼ, мятмиʼ]
#     мяˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [мятами, мятми] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [мятаниʼ, мятниʼ]
#     мяˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [мятани, мятни] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: мятриʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [мятамдиʼ, мятмдиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [мятандиʼ, мятндиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [мятадиʼ, мятдиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [мятамдиʼ, мятмдиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [мятандиʼ, мятндиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: мятваˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: мятваˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [мятанаˮ, мятнаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: мятраˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [мятамдаˮ, мятмдаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [мятандаˮ, мятндаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [мятадоʼ, мятдоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [мятамдоʼ, мятмдоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [мятандоʼ, мятндоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: мятмʼ
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: мят
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мяˮ
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: мяˮниʼ
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: мятиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мякʼ
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: мяˮмаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: мятаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мядˮ
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: мятамзь
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: мятась
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мяць
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: мяˮнинзь
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: мятинзь
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: мяканзь
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: мяˮмаць
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: мятаць
     мяˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мядаць
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мяˮам
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мяˮал
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мята
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мяˮмиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мяˮлиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мятиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мяˮмаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мяˮлаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мятоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мяˮмась
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мяˮлась
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мятась
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мяˮминзь
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мяˮлинзь
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мятинзь
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мяˮмаць
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мяˮлаць
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мятонзь
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [мякаюн, мякюн]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [мякаюд, мякюд]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [мякаюда, мякюда]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [мякаюниʼ, мякюниʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [мякаюдиʼ, мякюдиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [мякаюдиʼ, мякюдиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [мякаюнаˮ, мякюнаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [мякаюдаˮ, мякюдаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [мякаюдоʼ, мякюдоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [мякаюнась, мякюнась]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [мякаюдась, мякюдась]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [мякаюдась, мякюдась]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [мякаюнинзь, мякюнинзь]
